Illinois, session 104th, HB3506.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Safety and Security Protocol Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose. The General 7Assembly finds and declares:8    (a) Artificial intelligence, including new advances in 9generative artificial intelligence, has the potential to 10catalyze innovation and the rapid development of a wide range 11of benefits for Illinoisans and the Illinois economy, 12including advances in medicine, climate science, and 13education, and to push the bounds of human creativity and 14capacity.15    (b) If not properly subject to human controls, future 16development in artificial intelligence may also have the 17potential to be used to create novel threats to public safety 18and security, including by enabling the creation and the 19proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, such as 20biological, chemical, and nuclear weapons, as well as weapons 21with cyber-offensive capabilities.22    (c) If not properly subject to human controls, future 23artificial intelligence models may be able to cause serious   HB3506- 2 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1harm with limited human intervention.2    (d) This State has an essential role in fostering 3transparency, security, and reasonable care in the development 4of the most powerful artificial intelligence systems, in order 5to protect the safety, health, and economic interests of this 6State.7    (e) Actions taken by developers that reduce consumer 8prices for access to foundation models, increase the ability 9of artificial intelligence safety and security researchers to 10conduct research, increase interoperability between foundation 11models produced by different developers, improve the ability 12for small businesses to use foundation models, and promote 13privacy of user inputs to foundation models provide important 14societal benefits. 15    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:16    "Artificial intelligence model" means an engineered or 17machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and 18that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the 19input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence 20physical or virtual environments.21    "Critical risk" means a foreseeable and non-trivial risk 22that a developer's development, storage, or deployment of a 23foundation model will result in the death of, or serious 24injury to, more than 100 people, or more than $1,000,000,000 25in damage to rights in money or property, through any of the   HB3506- 3 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1following:2        (1) the creation and release of a chemical, 3    biological, radiological, or nuclear weapon;4        (2) a cyber-attack;5        (3) engaging in conduct that, would, if committed by a 6    human, constitute a crime specified under the Criminal 7    Code of 2012 that requires intent, recklessness, or gross 8    negligence, or the solicitation or aiding and abetting of 9    the crime, if that conduct occurs with limited human 10    intervention; and11        (4) evading the control of its developer or user.12    For the purposes of this definition, a harm inflicted by 13an intervening human actor does not result from the 14developer's activities unless those activities make it 15substantially easier or more likely for the actor to inflict 16the harm.17    "Deploy" means to use a foundation model or to make a 18foundation model foreseeably available to one or more third 19parties for use, modification, copying, or combination with 20other software, except as reasonably necessary for developing 21the foundation model or evaluating the foundation model or 22other foundation models.23    "Developer" means a person that has trained at least one 24foundation model with a quantity of computational power that 25costs at least $100,000,000 when measured using prevailing 26market prices of cloud computing.  HB3506- 4 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1    "Employee" means any individual permitted to work by a 2developer. "Employee" includes any corporate officers of the 3developer and any contractors, subcontractors, and unpaid 4advisors involved with assessing, managing, or addressing the 5risk of critical harm from covered models and covered model 6derivatives.7     "Foundation model" means an artificial intelligence model 8that:9        (1) is trained on a broad data set;10        (2) uses self-supervision in the training process; and11        (3) is applicable across a wide range of contexts.12     "Safety and security protocol" means a set of documented 13technical and organizational protocols used by a developer 14that describes in detail:15        (1) how the developer will manage critical risks;16        (2) how, if at all, the developer excludes certain 17    foundation models from being covered by its safety and 18    security protocol when those foundation models pose 19    limited critical risks;20        (3) thresholds at which critical risks would be deemed 21    intolerable and justifications for these thresholds and 22    what the developer will do if one or more thresholds are 23    surpassed;24        (4) the testing and assessment procedures the 25    developer uses to investigate critical risks and how these 26    tests account for the possibility that a foundation model   HB3506- 5 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1    could be misused, modified, or used to create another 2    foundation model;3        (5) the procedure the developer will use to determine 4    whether and how to deploy a foundation model when doing so 5    poses critical risks;6        (6) the physical, digital, and organizational security 7    protections the developer will implement to prevent 8    insiders or third parties from accessing foundation models 9    within the developer's control in a manner that is 10    unauthorized by the developer and could create critical 11    risk;12        (7) any safeguards and risk mitigation measures the 13    developer uses to reduce critical risks from its 14    foundation models and how the developer assesses their 15    efficacy and limitations;16        (8) how the developer will respond if a critical risk 17    materializes or is imminently about to materialize;18        (9) the procedure that the developer uses to determine 19    whether to conduct additional assessments for critical 20    risk when it modifies or expands access to its foundation 21    models or combines its foundation models with other 22    software and how the assessments are conducted;23        (10) the conditions under which the developer will 24    report incidents relevant to critical risk that have 25    occurred in connection with one or more of its foundation 26    models and the entities to which the developer will make   HB3506- 6 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1    those reports;2        (11) the conditions under which the developer may or 3    will make modifications to its safety and security 4    protocol;5        (12) the parts of the safety and security protocol, if 6    any, that the developer believes provide sufficient 7    scientific detail to allow for the independent assessment 8    of the methods used to generate the results, evidence, and 9    analysis, and to which experts, if any, unredacted 10    versions are made available; and11        (13) any other role, if any, financially disinterested 12    third parties play in the implementation of the other 13    items of this definition. 14    Section 15. Safety and Security Protocol. 15    (a) A developer shall produce, implement, follow, and 16conspicuously publish a safety and security protocol. If a 17developer makes a material modification to the safety and 18security protocol, the developer shall conspicuously publish 19those modifications no later than 30 days after the effective 20date of those modifications.21    (b) No less than every 90 days, a developer shall produce 22and conspicuously publish a risk assessment report. The risk 23assessment report shall cover the period between 120 and 30 24days before the submission of the risk assessment report `and 25include the following:  HB3506- 7 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1        (1) the conclusion of any risk assessments made 2    pursuant to the developer's safety and security protocol 3    during the reporting period;4        (2) if different from the preceding reporting period, 5    for each type of critical risk, an assessment of the 6    relevant capabilities in whichever of the developer's 7    foundation models, whether deployed or not, would pose the 8    highest level of that critical risk if deployed without 9    adequate safeguards and protections; and10        (3) if the developer has deployed a foundation model 11    or a modified version of a foundation model during the 12    reporting, that would, if deployed without adequate 13    safeguards and protections, pose a higher level of 14    critical risk than any of the developer's existing 15    deployed foundation models:16            (A) the grounds on which, and the process by 17        which, the developer decided to deploy the foundation 18        model; and19            (B) any safeguards and protections implemented by 20        the developer to mitigate critical risks.21    (c) A developer shall record and retain for a period of no 22less than 5 years any specific tests used and test results 23obtained as part of any assessments of critical risks, 24including sufficient detail for qualified third parties to 25replicate the testing.26    (d) A developer shall not knowingly make false or   HB3506- 8 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1materially misleading statements or omissions in or regarding 2documents produced under this Section. 3    Section 20. Redactions. If a developer publishes documents 4in order to comply with this Act, the developer may make 5redactions to those documents that are reasonably necessary to 6protect the developer's trade secrets, public safety, or the 7national security of the United States or to comply with any 8federal or State law. If a developer redacts information in a 9document, the developer shall:10        (1) retain an unredacted version of the document for 11    at least 5 years and allow the Attorney General to inspect 12    the unredacted version of the document upon request; and13        (2) describe the character and justification of the 14    redaction in any published version of the document, to the 15    extent permitted by the concerns that justify redaction. 16    Section 25. Audits.17    (a) At least once every calendar year, a developer shall 18retain a reputable third-party auditor to produce a report 19assessing the following:20        (1) whether the developer has complied with its safety 21    and security protocol and any instances of noncompliance 22    or ambiguous compliance;23        (2) any instances where the developer's safety and 24    security protocol has not been stated clearly enough to   HB3506- 9 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1    determine whether the developer has complied; and2        (3) any instances where the auditor believes the 3    developer may have violated subsection (d) of Section 15 4    or Section 20.5    (b) A developer shall allow the third-party auditor access 6to all materials produced to comply with this Act and any other 7materials reasonably necessary to perform the assessment 8required under subsection (a).9    (c) No later than 90 days after the completion of the 10third-party auditor's report required under subsection (a), 11the developer shall conspicuously publish the report. 12    Section 30. Whistleblower protections.13    (a) The provisions of the Whistleblower Act shall apply to 14this Act, except that the criminal penalties provided in the 15Whistleblower Act shall not be assessed in reference to this 16Act, in cases where an employee of a developer discloses 17information to the Attorney General and the employee has 18reasonable cause to believe that the information indicates 19that the developer's activities pose unreasonable or 20substantial critical risk.21    (b) A developer shall provide a reasonable internal 22process through which an employee may anonymously disclose 23information to the developer if the employee believes in good 24faith that information indicates that the developer's 25activities present an unreasonable critical risk, including a   HB3506- 10 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1monthly update to the person who made the disclosure regarding 2the status of the developer's investigation of the disclosure 3and the actions taken by the developer in response to the 4disclosure.5    (c) The disclosures and responses of the process required 6by this Section shall be maintained for a minimum of 7 years 7after the date when the disclosure is made to the developer or 8the response to the disclosure is made by the developer. Each 9disclosure and response shall be shared with the officers and 10directors of the developer who do not have a conflict of 11interest no less frequently than once every fiscal quarter. 12    Section 35. Enforcement.13    (a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against 14a developer that violates Sections 15 or 25. A developer found 15guilty of violating Sections 15 or 25 may be assessed a civil 16penalty not to exceed $1,000,000. In calculating the civil 17penalty assessed under this subsection, a court shall consider 18the severity of the violation and whether the violation 19resulted in, or could have resulted in, the materialization of 20a critical risk.21    (b) The Attorney General may seek injunctive or 22declaratory relief for any violation of this Act. The Attorney 23General may seek injunctive relief if a developer's activities 24present an imminent threat of catastrophic harm to the public. 25    (c) In determining whether a developer's act or omission   HB3506- 11 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1breached its common law duty to take reasonable care with 2respect to critical risks, the following considerations are 3relevant but not conclusive:4        (1) the quality of the developer's safety and security 5    protocol and the extent of the developer's adherence to 6    it;7        (2) whether, in quality and implementation, the 8    developer's investigation, documentation, evaluation, and 9    management of critical risks was inferior, comparable, or 10    superior to other developers of foundation models that may 11    pose comparable critical risk;12        (3) the extent to which the developer responsibly 13    informed the public of critical risks posed by its 14    foundation models; and15        (4) whether the societal benefit produced by the 16    developer's act or omission outweighed the associated 17    critical risk. 18    Section 40. Other duties required by law. The duties and 19obligations imposed by this Act are cumulative with any other 20duties or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be 21construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations 22imposed under other law and do not limit any rights or remedies 23under existing law. 24    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are   HB3506- 12 -LRB104 12155 SPS 22255 b1severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.